Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.395.020 and 2023 c 419 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) (("Basic personal hygiene items" means items used to promote or preserve a detained person's health and contribute to the prevention of disease or infection, including soap, toothbrush and toothpaste, shampoo and conditioner, lotion, nail clippers, comb, towels, and menstrual products.(2) "Culturally competent" includes: Knowledge of a detained person's cultural histories and contexts, as well as family norms and values in different cultures; knowledge and skills in accessing community resources and community outreach; and skills in adapting services and treatment to a detained person's experiences and identifying cultural contexts for individuals.(3)))"Abuse" means an act by any individual which injures, exploits, or in any way jeopardizes a detained person's health, welfare, or safety, including, but not limited to:(a) Physically damaging or potentially damaging nonaccidental acts;(b) Emotionally damaging verbal behavior and harassment or other actions which may result in emotional or behavioral problems; and(c) Sexual abuse, exploitation, and mistreatment through inappropriate touching, inappropriate remarks, or encouraging participation in pornography or prostitution.(2) "Detained person" means a person confined in a private detention facility.(((4)))(3) "Detention facility" means any facility in which persons are incarcerated or otherwise involuntarily confined for purposes including prior to trial or sentencing, fulfilling the terms of a sentence imposed by a court, or for other judicial or administrative processes or proceedings.(((5) "Fresh fruits and vegetables" means any unprocessed fruits or vegetables, not including any processed, canned, frozen, or dehydrated fruits or vegetables, or any fruits or vegetables infected or infested with insects or other contaminants.(6)(a) "Personal protective equipment" means equipment worn to minimize exposure to hazards that cause serious injuries and illness, which may result from contact with chemical, radiological, physical, electrical, mechanical, or other hazards.(b) Personal protective equipment may include items such as gloves, safety glasses and shoes, earplugs or muffs, hard hats, respirators, or coveralls, vests, and full body suits.(7)))(4) "Dietitian" means an individual certified under chapter 18.138 RCW.(5) "Neglect" means conduct which results in deprivation of care necessary to maintain a detained person's minimum physical and mental health including, but not limited to:(a) Physical and material deprivation;(b) Lack of medical care;(c) Inadequate food, clothing or cleanliness;(d) Refusal to acknowledge, hear, or consider a detained person's concerns;(e) Lack of social interaction and physical activity;(f) Lack of personal care; and(g) Lack of supervision appropriate for the detained person's level of functioning.(6) "Private detention facility" means a detention facility that is operated by a private, nongovernmental ((for-profit)) entity and operating pursuant to a contract or agreement with a federal, state, or local governmental entity.(((8) "Solitary confinement" means the confinement of a detained person alone in a cell or similarly confined holding or living space for 20 hours or more per day under circumstances other than a partial or facility wide lockdown.(9) "Telecommunications services" means phone calls or other voice communication services, video communications, and email services.))Sec. 2. RCW 70.395.040 and 2023 c 419 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department of health shall adopt rules as may be necessary to effectuate the intent and purposes of this section in order to ensure private detention facilities comply with measurable standards providing sanitary, hygienic, and safe conditions for detained persons. The department of health rules shall include that:(a) A detained person should have a safe, clean, and comfortable environment that allows a detained person to use the person's personal belongings to the extent possible;(b) Living areas, including areas used for sleeping, recreation, dining, telecommunications, visitation, and bathrooms, must be cleaned and sanitized regularly;(c) A private detention facility must provide laundry facilities, equipment, handling, and processes for linen and laundered items that are clean and in good repair, adequate to meet the needs of detained persons, and maintained according to the manufacturer's instructions. Laundry and linen must be handled, cleaned, and stored according to acceptable methods of infection control including preventing contamination from other sources. Separate areas for handling clean laundry and soiled laundry must be provided and laundry rooms and areas must be ventilated to the exterior;(d) Basic personal hygiene items must be provided to a detained person regularly at no cost;(e) A private detention facility shall provide a nutritious and balanced diet, including fresh fruits and vegetables, and shall recognize a detained person's need for a special diet. A private detention facility must follow proper food handling and hygiene practices. A private detention facility must provide at least three meals per day, at no cost, and at reasonable hours;(f) Safe indoor air quality must be maintained;(g) The private detention facility must have both heating and air conditioning equipment that can be adjusted by room or area. Rooms used by a detained person must be able to maintain interior temperatures between 65 degrees Fahrenheit and 78 degrees Fahrenheit year-round. Excessive odors and moisture must be prevented in the building; ((and))(h) A private detention facility must implement and maintain an infection control program that prevents the transmission of infections and communicable disease among detained persons, staff, and visitors((.)); and(i) A private detention facility must provide:(i) Ready access and equipment to accommodate detained persons with physical and mental disabilities;(ii) Adequate lighting in all areas;(iii) An adequate supply of hot and cold running water under pressure meeting the standards in chapters 246-290 and 246-291 WAC, with devices to prevent backflow into the potable water supply system, and water temperature not exceeding 120 degrees Fahrenheit automatically regulated at all plumbing fixtures used by detained persons;(iv) Written policies, procedures, and schedules for maintenance and housekeeping functions;(v) Housekeeping and service facilities on each floor, including:(A) One or more service sinks, designed for filling and emptying mop buckets;(B) Housekeeping closets that are equipped with shelving, ventilated to the out-of-doors, and kept locked; and(C) A utility service area designed and equipped for washing, disinfecting, storing, and housing medical and nursing supplies and equipment; and(vi) Equipment and facilities to collect and dispose of all sewage, garbage, refuse, and liquid waste in a safe and sanitary manner.(2) The office of the attorney general may enforce violations of this section on its own initiative or in response to complaints or violations.Sec. 3. RCW 70.395.050 and 2023 c 419 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department of health may at any time inspect a private detention facility to determine whether it has failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the standards or rules adopted under this chapter, or other applicable state or federal statutes or rules regulating such facilities.(2) The department of health shall:(a) Conduct routine, unannounced inspections of private detention facilities including, but not limited to, inspection of food service and food handling, sanitation and hygiene, and nutrition as provided in (c) of this subsection;(b) Conduct investigations of complaints received relating to any private detention facility located within the state;(c) Regularly review the list of food items provided to detained persons to ensure the specific nutrition and calorie needs of each detained person are met, including any needs related to medical requirements, food allergies, or religious dietary restrictions;(d) Test water used for drinking and bathing and air quality every six months at private detention facilities both inside and outside of the facility; and(e) Post inspection results on its website and in a conspicuous place viewable by detained persons and visitors to private detention facilities. Results should be posted in English and in languages spoken by detainees, to the extent practicable.(((2)))(3) The department of health may delegate food safety inspections to the local health jurisdiction, where the local health jurisdiction is in the county where the private detention facility is located, to conduct inspections pursuant to regulations.(((3)))(4) The department of health shall adopt rules as may be necessary to effectuate the intent and purposes of this section in order to ensure private detention facilities allow regular inspections and comply with measurable standards providing sanitary, hygienic, and safe conditions for detained persons.(((4)))(5) The department of labor and industries shall conduct routine, unannounced inspections of workplace conditions at private detention facilities, including work undertaken by detained persons.(((5)))(6) The office of the attorney general may enforce violations of this section on its own initiative or in response to complaints or violations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 70.395 RCW to read as follows:In any case in which the department of health conducts an inspection of a private detention facility and finds that the private detention facility has failed or refused to comply with applicable state statutes or regulations, the department of health may take one or more of the following actions:(1) When the department of health determines the private detention facility has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or has failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department of health, the department of health may impose reasonable conditions on the private detention facility, which may include correction within a specified amount of time, training, or hiring a consultant approved by the department of health if the private detention facility cannot demonstrate that it has access to sufficient internal expertise.(2)(a) In accordance with the authority under RCW 43.70.095, the department of health may assess a civil fine of up to $10,000 per violation, not to exceed a total fine of $1,000,000, on a private detention facility if the private detention facility has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or has failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department of health.(b) Proceeds from these fines may only be used by the department of health to provide training or technical assistance to private detention facilities.(c) The department of health shall adopt in rules specific fine amounts in relation to the severity of the noncompliance.(d) If a private detention facility is aggrieved by the department of health's action of assessing civil fines, the private detention facility has the right to appeal under RCW 43.70.095.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 70.395 RCW to read as follows:As resources allow, the department of health shall make private detention facility inspection statements of deficiencies, plans of correction, notice of acceptance of plans of correction, enforcement actions, and notices of resolution available to the public on the internet.Sec. 6. RCW 70.395.060 and 2023 c 419 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section does not apply to private detention facilities operating pursuant to a valid contract that was in effect prior to January 1, 2023, for the duration of that contract, not to include any extensions or modifications made to, or authorized by, that contract.(2) A private detention facility operating pursuant to a contract or agreement with a federal, state, or local government shall comply with the following:(a) ((A detained person, upon admission to a private detention facility, must be issued new clothing and new footwear for both indoor and outdoor use and for protection against cold and heat. Clothing issued must be regularly laundered and replaced at no cost once no longer hygienic or serviceable;(b) Any food items in the commissary must be available at reasonable prices taking into account the income and financial circumstances of detained persons;(c) Telecommunications services must be provided free of charge to detained persons and any communication, whether initiated or received through such a service, must be free of charge to the detained person initiating or receiving the communication. Each detained person must be eligible to use these telecommunications services for at least 60 minutes on each day of the person's detainment. Private detention facilities must not use the provision of telecommunications services or any other communication service to supplant in-person contact visits any detained person may be eligible to receive;(d) In-person visitation must be available daily. Visitation rooms must allow for the presence of children and personal contact between visiting persons and detained persons may not be restricted. A detained person may receive reading and writing materials during visitation;(e) Solitary confinement is prohibited;(f) Televisions must be available and accessible to a detained person at no cost. The private detention facility shall make every effort to make television programming available in the language of the detained person;(g) Handheld radios must be provided to a detained person at no cost;(h) A detained person may invite persons to the private detention facility to provide legal education, know your rights presentations, and other similar programming;(i) Computer and internet access must be available and accessible to a detained person at no cost;(j) A law library must be available and accessible;(k) Communication from the private detention facility to a detained person, either in writing or verbally, must be delivered in the primary language of the detained person;(l) Sexual violence and harassment grievances must be responded to immediately by culturally competent professionals on-site and reported to local law enforcement in the county where the private detention facility is located;(m) Mental health evaluations should occur at intake and periodically, at least once a week. Culturally competent mental health therapy must be available and free;(n) Requested medical care and attention must be provided without delay, including the provision of requested medical accommodations;(o) Rooms used by a detained person for sleeping must have access to windows, natural light, and natural air circulation. Subject to safety limitations, sleeping rooms must include adjustable curtains, shades, blinds, or the equivalent installed at the windows for visual privacy and that are shatterproof, screened, or of the security type as determined by the private detention facility needs; and(p) A private detention facility must be equipped to respond to natural and human-made emergencies, including earthquakes, lahar threats, tsunami, and industrial accidents. A private detention facility must be earthquake resistant. A private detention facility shall develop emergency operation and continuity of operations plans and provide those plans to the local emergency management department. A private detention facility must stock all necessary personal protective equipment in case of disease outbreaks consistent with large numbers of people detained in close contact to one another.))The private detention facility shall:(i) Comply with food service rules under chapters 246-215 and 246-217 WAC;(ii) Designate an individual responsible for managing and supervising food services 24 hours per day, including:(A) Incorporating ongoing recommendations of a dietitian;(B) Serving at least three meals a day at regular intervals with 15 or fewer hours between the evening meal and breakfast, unless the facility provides a nutritious snack between the evening meal and breakfast;(C) Providing well-balanced meals and nourishments that meet the current recommendations published in recommended dietary allowances by the national research council, 10th edition, 1989, adjusted for the detained person's age, sex, and activities unless contraindicated;(D) Making nourishing snacks available as needed for detained persons, and posted as part of the menu;(E) Preparing and serving therapeutic diets according to written medical orders;(F) Preparing and serving meals under the supervision of food service staff;(G) Maintaining a current diet manual, approved in writing by the dietitian and medical staff, for use in planning and preparing therapeutic diets; and(H) Ensuring all menus: Are written at least one week in advance; indicate the date, day of week, month, and year; include all foods and snacks served that contribute to nutritional requirements; provide a variety of foods; are approved in writing by the dietitian; are posted in a location easily accessible to detained persons at the facility; and are retained for one year;(iii) Substitute foods, when necessary, of comparable nutrient value and record changes on the menu;(iv) Allow sufficient time for detained persons to consume meals;(v) Ensure staff from dietary and food services are present in the facility during all meal times; and(vi) Keep policies and procedures pertaining to food storage, preparation, and cleaning food service equipment and work areas in the food service area for easy reference by dietary staff at all times;(b) The private detention facility shall provide a readily available telephone for detained persons to make and receive confidential calls, and make a nonpay telephone or equivalent communication device readily accessible on each floor occupied by a detained person for emergency use;(c) The private detention facility shall provide a visiting area allowing privacy for detained persons and visitors;(d) The private detention facility shall develop and implement the written policies and procedures consistent with assuring the rights of detained persons, protecting against abuse and neglect, and reporting suspected incidents, and post those policies and procedures in a prominent place for detained persons at the facility to read;(e) The private detention facility shall employ sufficient, qualified staff to:(i) Provide adequate services to detained persons;(ii) Maintain the facility free of safety hazards; and(iii) Implement fire and disaster plans;(f) The private detention facility shall provide and document orientation and appropriate training for all staff, including:(i) Organization of the facility;(ii) Physical layout of facility, including buildings, departments, exits, and services;(iii) Fire and disaster plans, including monthly drills;(iv) Infection control;(v) Specific duties and responsibilities;(vi) Policies, procedures, and equipment necessary to perform duties;(vii) Policies related to the rights of detained persons and protecting against abuse and neglect;(viii) Managing the behavior of detained persons; and(ix) Appropriate training for expected duties; and(g) The private detention facility shall establish and implement an effective facility-wide infection control program including, at a minimum, the following:(i) Written policies and procedures describing:(A) Types of surveillance used to monitor rates of infections originating at the facility;(B) Systems to collect and analyze data; and(C) Activities to prevent and control infections;(ii) A review process to determine if staff and detained person infections originated at the facility;(iii) A procedure for reviewing and approving infection control aspects of policies and procedures used in each area of the facility;(iv) A procedure to monitor the physical environment of the facility for situations which may contribute to the spread of infectious diseases; and(v) Provisions for:(A) Providing consultation regarding care practices, equipment, and supplies which may influence the risk of infection;(B) Providing consultation regarding appropriate procedures and products for cleaning, disinfecting, and sterilizing;(C) Providing infection control information for orientation and in-service education for staff providing direct care;(D) Making recommendations, consistent with federal, state, and local laws and rules, for methods of safe and sanitary disposal of sewage, solid and liquid wastes, and infectious wastes, including safe management of sharps;(E) Identifying specific precautions to prevent transmission of infections; and(F) Coordinating employee activities to control exposure and transmission of infections to or from employees and others performing services.(3) The office of the attorney general may enforce violations of this section on its own initiative or in response to complaints or violations.Sec. 7. RCW 70.395.100 and 2023 c 419 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:RCW 70.395.040 through 70.395.080 and sections 4 and 5 of this act do not apply to a private detention facility that is:(1) Providing ((rehabilitative,)) counseling, treatment, mental health, educational, or medical services to juveniles ((who are subject to Title 13 RCW, or similarly applicable federal law))under chapter 74.15 RCW;(2) Providing evaluation and treatment or forensic services to a person who has been civilly detained or is subject to an order of commitment by a court pursuant to chapter 10.77, 71.05, 71.09, or 71.34 RCW, or similarly applicable federal law, including facilities regulated under chapters 70.41, 71.12, and 71.24 RCW;(3) Used for the quarantine or isolation of persons for public health reasons pursuant to RCW 43.20.050, or similarly applicable federal law;(4) Used for work release under chapter 72.65 RCW, or similarly applicable federal law;(5) Used for extraordinary medical placement;(6) Used for residential substance use disorder treatment; or(7) Owned and operated by federally recognized tribes and contracting with a government.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. This act shall be construed liberally to effectuate its purposes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---